Hawaii statutes.
§132D-14 Penalty. (a) Any person:

(1) Importing aerial devices, display fireworks, or
articles pyrotechnic without having a valid license under section 132D-7 shall
be guilty of a class C felony;

(2) Purchasing, possessing, setting off, igniting, or
discharging aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic without
a valid permit under sections 132D-10 and 132D-16, or storing, selling, or
possessing aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic without a
valid license under section 132D-7:

(A) If the total weight of the aerial devices,
display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic is twenty-five pounds or more, shall
be guilty of a class C felony; or

(B) If the total weight of the aerial devices,
display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic is less than twenty-five pounds,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor;

(3) Who transfers or sells aerial devices, display
fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic to a person who does not have a valid permit
under sections 132D-10 and 132D-16, shall be guilty of a class C felony; and

(4) Who removes or extracts the pyrotechnic contents
from any fireworks or articles pyrotechnic and uses the contents to construct
fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, or a fireworks or articles pyrotechnic related
device shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) or as
otherwise specifically provided for in this chapter, any person violating any
other provision of this chapter, shall be fined not more than $2,000 for each
violation.

(c) The court shall collect the fines imposed
in subsections (a) and (b) for violating this chapter and, of the fines
collected, shall pay twenty per cent to the State and eighty per cent to the
county in which the fine was imposed which shall be expended by the county for
law enforcement purposes.

(d) Notwithstanding any penalty set forth
herein, violations of subsection (a)(1) or (3) may be subject to nuisance
abatement proceedings provided in part V of chapter 712. [L 1994, c 180, pt of
§1; am L 2000, c 233, §12; am L 2006, c 183, §16; am L 2010, c 136, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next